Maine, session 132, LD1213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §81, sub-§10, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended to
read:
10. Premium. "Premium" means a ribbon, trophy or monetary amount or a service or
object with monetary value awarded as a prize in a competition or event.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §85, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended to read:
The Treasurer of State shall establish the Fair Fund and shall annually credit a sum of
money equal to 5% of the total amount designated as state share in accordance with Title
8, section 286 to the Fair Fund. The commissioner shall make distributions from the Fair
Fund only to licensees eligible for a stipend under section 86, subsections 5 and 6.
Distributions are prorated according to the amount of premiums and gratuities actually paid
by those licensees in full and in cash or valuable equivalent. Restrictions on premiums and
gratuities used to determine apportionment of a stipend under section 86, subsection 5 apply
to distribution from the Fair Fund.
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §86, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended to
read:
5. Distribution to all eligible licensees. The amount remaining in the Stipend Fund
after distributions in accordance with subsections 2, 3 and 4 must be divided among fair
licensees meeting the eligibility criteria in subsection 6, prorated according to the amount
of premiums and gratuities actually paid by those licensees in full and in cash or valuable
equivalent.
In determining distribution under this subsection, no an allowance is may not be made on
premiums offered and paid by a licensee at any competition or event held other than during
the period at in which its annual fair is held. Allowance may not be made or consideration
given for lump sums, payments or premiums previously arranged and agreed upon for the
presentation and display of any animals or products without regard to competition or event.
Premiums and gratuities used to determine apportionment under this subsection are limited
to those paid for:
Page 1 - 132LR1440(03)

A. Livestock and poultry;
B. Vegetables, grains, fruits and flowers;
C. Products derived from livestock and dairy products;
D. Home-canned, home-cooked and home-baked goods;
E. Grange and farm exhibits;
F. Boys' and girls' club exhibits;
F-1. Youth agriculture events;
G. Mechanical arts exhibits;
H. Domestic and fancy articles Arts and crafts produced in the home;
I. Pulling contests for equines and oxen; and
J. Pulling contests for farm tractors and pickup trucks.;
K. Educational agricultural talks, workshops and demonstrations; and
L. Any other agricultural event approved by the commissioner.
Sec. 4. 7 MRSA §86, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2021, c. 681, Pt. J, §1, is further
amended to read:
8. Maximum allowed distribution from Stipend Fund. A licensee may not receive
a stipend from the Stipend Fund greater than the amount actually raised and spent by the
licensee on premiums and gratuities in the classes provided in subsection 5. A licensee
may not receive a stipend from the Stipend Fund in excess of $10,000, except that this
limitation does not apply to any additional stipend provided for by Title 8, section 287 or
to funds distributed from the Fair Fund in accordance with section 85, the Agricultural Fair
Support Fund in accordance with section 91 or the Agricultural Fair Promotion Fund in
accordance with section 103.
Sec. 5. 7 MRSA §88, sub-§1, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended
to read:
B. The commissioner submits a certificate to the executive director of the State
Harness Racing Commission stating that the commissioner has examined the claim of
the licensee and determined that the licensee has complied with sections 86 and 87 and
has awarded and paid as premiums and gratuities a sum equal to or greater than the
stipend received by the licensee.
Page 2 - 132LR1440(03)